Alaska statutes. Title 37. Public Finance.
Article 7. Constitutional Budget Reserve Fund.

Cross references. —

For statement of legislative intent, see § 2, ch. 5, SLA 1994 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 37.10.410.
“Administrative proceedings involving taxes” defined.

The following money received by the state is considered to be received as a result of the termination of an administrative proceeding for purposes of applying art. IX, sec. 17(a), Constitution of the State of Alaska:

past due taxes that are received by the state for each tax year for which a request for an informal conference under AS

43.05.240

is made to the Department of Revenue, together with penalties and interest on the taxes;

past due taxes that are received by the state after a request for a formal hearing under AS

43.05.241

is made to the Department of Revenue, together with penalties and interest on the taxes.

Money received by the state under the following conditions is not considered to be received as the result of the termination of an administrative proceeding for purposes of applying art. IX, sec. 17(a), Constitution of the State of Alaska:

taxes that are not due at the time the request for the proceeding was made under AS

43.05.240

,

43.05.241

, or

43.05.242

;

taxes set out in a return not audited by the Department of Revenue at the date of collection; or

taxes collected for a tax year for which the taxpayer did not give notice of appeal of an assessment made by the Department of Revenue.

History.

(§ 1 ch 5 SLA 1994; am § 5 ch 108 SLA 1996)

Sec. 37.10.420.
“Money available for appropriation” defined.

For purposes of applying art. IX, sec. 17(b), Constitution of the State of Alaska,

“the amount available for appropriation” or “funds available for appropriation” means

the unrestricted revenue accruing to the general fund during the fiscal year;

general fund program receipts as defined in AS

37.05.146

;

the unreserved, undesignated general fund balance carried forward from the preceding fiscal year that is not subject to the repayment obligation imposed by art. IX, sec. 17(d), Constitution of the State of Alaska; and

the balance in the statutory budget reserve fund established in AS

37.05.540

;

“the amount appropriated for the previous fiscal year” means the amount appropriated from the

constitutional budget reserve fund under the authority granted in art. IX, sec. 17, Constitution of the State of Alaska; and

same revenue sources used to calculate the money available for appropriation for the current fiscal year; and

“the amount of appropriations made in the previous calendar year for the previous fiscal year” means appropriations made from sources identified in (2) of this subsection for a fiscal year that were enacted during the calendar year that ends on December 31 of that same fiscal year.

If the amount appropriated from the budget reserve fund has not been repaid under art. IX, sec. 17(d), Constitution of the State of Alaska, the Department of Administration shall transfer to the budget reserve fund the amount of money comprising the unreserved, undesignated general fund balance to be carried forward as of June 30 of the fiscal year, or as much of it as is necessary to complete the repayment. The transfer shall be made on or before December 16 of the following fiscal year.

In this section, “unrestricted revenue accruing to the general fund” or “unreserved, undesignated general fund balance carried forward” is money not restricted by law to a specific use that accrues to the general fund according to accepted principles of governmental or fund accounting adopted for the state accounting system established under AS

37.05.150

in effect on July 1, 1990.

An appropriation under art. IX, sec. 17(b), Constitution of the State of Alaska, requires an affirmative vote of the majority of the members of each house of the legislature. An appropriation under art. IX, sec. 17(c) requires an affirmative vote of three-fourths of the members of each house of the legislature.

History.

(§ 1 ch 5 SLA 1994)

Sec. 37.10.430.
Management of the budget reserve fund.

The Department of Revenue may transfer management responsibility over all or a portion of the budget reserve fund (art. IX, sec. 17, Constitution of the State of Alaska) to the Alaska Permanent Fund Corporation.

By March 15 of each year, the Department of Revenue shall, after consulting with the Alaska Permanent Fund Corporation, prepare a report setting out the balance in the budget reserve fund (art. IX, sec. 17, Constitution of the State of Alaska) on January 1 and on December 31 of the previous calendar year. The report shall state the nominal, real, and realized return on the budget reserve fund compared to the nominal, real, and realized return on the permanent fund and the general fund during the previous calendar year.

A special subaccount is established in the budget reserve fund (art. IX, sec. 17, Constitution of the State of Alaska). Money in the subaccount shall be invested to yield higher returns than might be feasible to obtain with other money in the budget reserve fund. In establishing or modifying the investment policy for the subaccount in the constitutional budget reserve fund, the commissioner of revenue shall assume that those funds will not be needed for at least five years. Income earned on money in the subaccount shall be retained in the subaccount by the department.

History.

(§ 1 ch 41 SLA 1996; am § 1 ch 129 SLA 2000)